West Virginia, session 2026, SB17.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 9. State sovereignty Act of 2026. §1-9-1. Title. This act shall be titled State Sovereignty Act of 2026. §1-9-2. Rejection of jurisdiction of the World Health Organization, the United Nations, and the World Economic Form. (a) The World Health Organization, the United Nations, and the World Economic Forum have no jurisdiction in this state. The state of West Virginia and its political subdivisions, including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns, precincts, water districts, school districts, school administrative units, or quasi-public entities, shall not be compelled to engage in the enforcement of, or any collaboration with the enforcement of, any requirements or mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United Nations, or the World Economic Forum. (b) Any requirements or mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United Nations, or the World Economic Forum shall not be used in this state as a basis for action or to direct, order, or otherwise impose any requirements whatsoever that are contrary to the constitution and laws of this state. This includes, but is not limited to, mandates for masks, vaccines, medical testing, or the gathering of any public or private information about the state’s citizens or residents. Any requirements or mandates issued by these foreign entities shall have no force or effect in this state.